District of Columbia statutes.
16-4201

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Mediation” means a process in which a mediator facilitates communication and negotiation between parties to assist them in reaching a voluntary agreement regarding their dispute.

(2)

“Mediation communication” means a statement, whether oral or in a record or verbal or nonverbal, that occurs during a mediation or is made for purposes of considering, conducting, participating in, initiating, continuing, or reconvening a mediation or retaining a mediator.

(3)

“Mediation party” means a person that participates in a mediation and whose agreement is necessary to resolve the dispute.

(4)

“Mediator” means an individual who conducts a mediation.

(5)

“Nonparty participant” means a person, other than a party or mediator, that participates in a mediation.

(6)

“Person” means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, government; governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality; public corporation, or any other legal or commercial entity.

(7)

“Proceeding” means:

(A)

A judicial, administrative, arbitral, or other adjudicative process, including related pre-hearing and post-hearing motions, conferences, and discovery; or

(B)

A legislative hearing or similar process.

(8)

“Record” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

(9)

“Sign” means:

(A)

To execute or adopt a tangible symbol with the present intent to authenticate a record; or

(B)

To attach or logically associate an electronic symbol, sound, or process to or with a record with the present intent to authenticate a record.

Apr. 4, 2006, D.C. Law 16-87, § 2(b), 53 DCR 1075
This section is referenced in § 16-4210.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 2 of the Uniform Mediation Act.